incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
!!= @CODE@ lē'mi:lēmi 202
LEXICON A_LĒʼMI
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 203
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KĒRATÕKS !!= @CODE@ : 207
%<a%>:	NMN_KĒRATÕKS	;

LEXICON A_VARĪKŠ !!= @CODE@ varīkš: 209
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ŪŽ !!= @CODE@ : 219
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_JŪŖ !!= @CODE@ jūŗ:jūr 221
%<a%>:	NMN_JŪŖ	;

LEXICON A_SŪR !!= @CODE@ sūr:sūr 222
%<a%>:	NMN_SŪR	;

LEXICON A_SALĀJ !!= @CODE@ : 225
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_UMĀRZ !!= @CODE@ umārz:umār 226
	NMN_UMĀRZ   ;

LEXICON A_DULLÕNZ !!= @CODE@ dullõnz:dullõn 227
	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON A_AŅGÕRZ !!= @CODE@ : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON A_TIDĀR !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_APPÕN !!= @CODE@ appõn:appõn 235
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ǬʼRÕN !!= @CODE@ ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_KĪNDÕR !!= @CODE@ kīndõr:kīndõr 237
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_BÄʼZMÕR !!= @CODE@ bäʼzmõr:bäzmõr 238
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_TARĪĻ !!= @CODE@ tarīļ:tarīļ 239
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ĀNKAŖ !!= @CODE@ ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
%<a%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON A_ǬʼBIĻ !!= @CODE@ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
%<a%>:	CASES	;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adjective inflection
!! --------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language adjectives compare.

! aigiz 188
LEXICON Po-aigiz
	PoTag	;

LEXICON PoTag
%<po%>:0        CASES   ;

LEXICON POSTP_
%<adp%>%<po%>: # ;

LEXICON	 PREP_
%<adp%>%<pr%>: # ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! !!!Conjunctions

LEXICON CONJ_ !! These need to be corrected
%<tyä%>: # ;


LEXICON CC_ !! Livonian conjunctors
%<cc%>: # ;


LEXICON CS_ !! Livonian subjunctors
%<cs%>: # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! !!! Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! Livonian nouns inflect in cases.

! PROBLEMS with dictionary lexica
LEXICON N_¤51
%<tyä%>: # ;
LEXICON N_¤37
%<tyä%>: # ;
LEXICON N_¤29
%<tyä%>: # ;

!! !! Stem lexica
LEXICON N_PŪ !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
!! ~156
%<n%>:	NMN_PŪ ;

LEXICON N_PŪ-PL !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
%<n%>:	NMN_PŪ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_RǬʼ !!= @CODE@ contains rǭʼ:rǭʼ 13
%<n%>:	NMN_RǬʼ	;

LEXICON N_PǞ !!= @CODE@ contains pǟ:pǟ 14
%<n%>:	NMN_PǞ	;

LEXICON N_TĪE !!= @CODE@ contains tīe:tīe 15
%<n%>:	NMN_TĪE	;
	
LEXICON N_TĪE-PL !!= @CODE@ contains tīe:tīe 15
%<n%>:     NMN_TĪE-PL   ;

LEXICON N_BRĪ !!= @CODE@ contains brī:brī 16
%<n%>:	NMN_BRĪ	  ;
	
LEXICON N_TEI !!= @CODE@ contains tei:tei 17
%<n%>:	NMN_TEI	;

LEXICON N_KALĀ  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
%<n%>:	NMN_KALĀ   ;

LEXICON N_KALĀ-SG  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
%<n%>:	NMN_KALĀ-SG    ;

LEXICON N_KALĀ-PL  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18
%<n%>:	NMN_KALĀ-PL    ;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ !!= @CODE@ tubā:tuʼbā 19
%<n%>: 	NMN_TUBĀ	;

LEXICON N_TUBĀ-PL !!= @CODE@ tubā:tuʼbā 19
%<n%>:	NMN_TUBĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AIGĀ !!= @CODE@ aigā:aigā 20
%<n%>:	NMN_AIGĀ	;

LEXICON N_LĒBA !!= @CODE@ lēba:lēba 21
%<n%>:	NMN_LĒBA	;

LEXICON N_PŪOGA !!= @CODE@ pūoga:pūoga 22
%<n%>:	NMN_PŪOGA	;

LEXICON N_LǬJA !!= @CODE@ lǭja:lǭja 23
%<n%>:	NMN_LǬJA	;

LEXICON N_LǬJA-PL !!= @CODE@ lǭja:lǭja 23
%<n%>:     NMN_LǬJA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PǞVA !!= @CODE@ pǟva:pǟva 24
%<n%>:	NMN_PǞVA	;

LEXICON N_PǞVA-PL !!= @CODE@ pǟva:pǟva 24
%<n%>:     NMN_PǞVA-PL   ;

LEXICON N_IZĀ !!= @CODE@ izā:izā 25
%<n%>:	NMN_IZĀ	;

LEXICON N_AŽĀ !!= @CODE@ ažā:ažā 26
%<n%>:	NMN_AŽĀ	;

LEXICON N_AŽĀ-PL !!= @CODE@ ažā:ažā 26
%<n%>:     NMN_AŽĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA !!= @CODE@ āļdža:āļdža 27
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SUKĀ !!= @CODE@ sukā:sukā 28
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LIEPĀ !!= @CODE@ liepā:liepā 29
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_OKSĀ !!= @CODE@ oksā:oksā 30
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VȰNTSA !!= @CODE@ vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LIESTĀ !!= @CODE@ liestā:liestā 32
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĀIGA !!= @CODE@ āiga:āiga 33
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LĀNGA !!= @CODE@ lānga:lānga 33
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA !!= @CODE@ sīlma:sīlma 34
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SĪLMA-PL !!= @CODE@ sīlma:sīlma 34
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KǞNGA !!= @CODE@ kǟnga:kǟnga 35
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĀINA !!= @CODE@ āina:āina 36
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĀINA-PL !!= @CODE@ āina:āina 36
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_VĒNA !!= @CODE@ vēna:vēna 37
%<n%>:	NMN_VĒNA	;

LEXICON N_RŌDA !!= @CODE@ rōda:rōda 38
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_RŌDA-PL !!= @CODE@ rōda:rōda 38
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
%<n%>:	NMN_PADĀ   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ-SG !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
%<n%>:	NMN_PADĀ-SG   ;

LEXICON N_PADĀ-PL !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
%<n%>:	NMN_PADĀ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ !!= @CODE@ sõbrā:sõbrā 40
%<n%>:	NMN_PADĀ	;

LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ-PL !!= @CODE@ sõbrā:sõbrā 40
%<n%>:	NMN_PADĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ !!= @CODE@ käpā:käpā 41
%<n%>:     NMN_PADĀ  ;

LEXICON N_KÄPĀ-PL !!= @CODE@ käpā:käpā 41
%<n%>:     NMN_PADĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_MAKSĀ !!= @CODE@ maksā:maksā 42
%<n%>:     NMN_PADĀ  ;

LEXICON N_MAKSĀ-PL !!= @CODE@ maksā:maksā 42
%<n%>:     NMN_PADĀ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KĒRA !!= @CODE@ kēra:kēra 43
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_JǬRA !!= @CODE@ jǭra:jǭra 44
%<n%>:	NMN_JǬRA	;

LEXICON N_JǬRA-PL !!= @CODE@ jǭra:jǭra 44
%<n%>:	NMN_JǬRA-PL	;

LEXICON N_PŪOLA !!= @CODE@ pūola:pūola 45
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĀITA !!= @CODE@ āita:āita 46
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_ĀITA-PL !!= @CODE@ āita:āita 46
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_ŪŠKA !!= @CODE@ ūška:ūška 47
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MȬKA !!= @CODE@ mȭka:mȭka 48
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_DADŽĀ !!= @CODE@ dadžā:dadžā 49
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SUŠĀ !!= @CODE@ sušā:sušā 50
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUPŠĀ !!= @CODE@ kupšā:kupšā 51
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TŠŪRTŠA !!= @CODE@ tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SĒMḐA !!= @CODE@ sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TĪERA !!= @CODE@ tīera:tīera 54
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KRǬIPA !!= @CODE@ krǭipa:krǭipa 55
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_LILLA !!= @CODE@ kuțā:kuțā 57
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUȚĀ
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_NĒTŠA !!= @CODE@ nētša:nētša 58
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KIʼV !!= @CODE@ kiʼv:kiv 59
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUOʼIG !!= @CODE@ kuoʼig:kuoʼig 60
%<n%>:	NMN_KUOʼIG	;

LEXICON N_KEP !!= @CODE@ kep:kep aʼb 61
        CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KEP-PL !!= @CODE@ kep:kep aʼb 61
        PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KRUȚK !!= @CODE@ : 62
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KRÄMP !!= @CODE@ : 63
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PIʼŅ !!= @CODE@ piʼņ:piņ 64
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_PIʼŅ-PL !!= @CODE@ piʼņ:piņ 64
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KUOȚ !!= @CODE@ : 65
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUOȚ-PL !!= @CODE@ : 65
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_VAKȚ !!= @CODE@ : 66
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_REŅ !!= @CODE@ : 67
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_OKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 68
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KAŠ !!= @CODE@ : 69
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_DUŅTŠ !!= @CODE@ : 70
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TORĪ !!= @CODE@ : 71
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VAʼG !!= @CODE@ vaʼg:vag 72
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VAʼG-PL !!= @CODE@ vaʼg:vag 72
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_KÕʼL !!= @CODE@ kõʼl:kõl 73
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_SUʼG !!= @CODE@ suʼg:sug 74
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_JOʼUG !!= @CODE@ joʼug:joug 75
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_NIʼM !!= @CODE@ niʼm:nim 76
%<n%>:	NMN_NIʼM	;

LEXICON N_NIʼM-PL !!= @CODE@ niʼm:nim 76
%<n%>:     NMN_NIʼM-PL   ;

LEXICON N_USK !!= @CODE@ usk: 77
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_VAŠK !!= @CODE@ : 78
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TUP !!= @CODE@ tup:tup 79
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_TUP-PL !!= @CODE@ tup:tup 79
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;

LEXICON N_MAKS !!= @CODE@ : 80
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MAKS-PL !!= @CODE@ : 80
%<n%>:     PL-CASES   ;


LEXICON N_LUʼM !!= @CODE@ luʼm:lum 81
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MIEʼR !!= @CODE@ mieʼr:mier 82
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MEʼR !!= @CODE@ meʼr:mer 83
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_MUʼR !!= @CODE@ muʼr:mur 84
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUOʼD !!= @CODE@ kuoʼd:kuod aig 85
        CASES   ;

LEXICON N_SUʼŽ !!= @CODE@ suʼž:suž 86
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KEʼŽ !!= @CODE@ keʼž:kež aim 87
        CASES   ;

LEXICON N_VEʼŽ !!= @CODE@ veʼž:vež 88
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_KUʼŽ !!= @CODE@ kuʼž:kuž 89
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON N_RUZŪ !!= @CODE@ : 90
%<n%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON adjectives
aʼrgiļ:aʼrgiļ A_ǬʼBIĻ   ; !"XX"
dullõnz:dullõn A_DULLÕNZ   ; !"XX"
kräbīļ:kräbīļ A_TARĪĻ   ; !"XX"
krõbīž:krõbīž A_VARĪKŠ   ; !"XX"
lōrkatõks:lōrkatõks A_KĒRATÕKS   ; !"XX"
mingisuʼglimi:mingi#suʼglimi A_LĒʼMI   ; !"XX"
nīstõn:nīstõn A_APPÕN   ; !"XX"
normāl:normāl A_TIDĀR   ; !"XX"
nõʼddõr:nõʼddõr A_BÄʼZMÕR   ; !"XX"
nūoŗ:nūoŗ A_JŪŖ   ; !"XX"
ǭʼdõrz:ǭʼdõr A_AŅGÕRZ   ; !"XX"
parāz:parāz A_ALĪZ   ; !"XX"
sūr:sūr A_SŪR   ; !"suuri"
ūž:ūž A_ŪŽ   ; !"uusi"
vāldiņ:vāldiņ A_ĀNKAŖ   ; !"XX"
vaʼnbõn:vaʼnbõn A_ǬʼRÕN   ; !"XX"
vingõr:vingõr A_KĪNDÕR   ; !"XX"
LEXICON adpositions
tagān:tagān POSTP_   ; !"XX"
vastõ:vastõ PREP_   ; !"XX"
LEXICON nouns
ilgõ:ilgõ N_¤37   ; !"XX"
konkš:konkš N_DUŅTŠ   ; !"XX"
koʼl:koʼl N_KÕʼL   ; !"XX"
krämp:krämp N_KRÄMP   ; !"XX"
kuoʼd:kuoʼd N_KUOʼD   ; !"koti"
kupšā:kupšā N_KUPŠĀ   ; !"XX"
kuțā:kuțā N_KUȚĀ   ; !"XX"
kõʼurõkeʼž:kõʼurõ#keʼž N_KEʼŽ   ; !"XX"
lakād:lakā N_KÄPĀ-PL   ; !"XX"
lejākudūd:lejā#kuʼd N_NIʼM-PL   ; !"XX"
liepā:liepā N_LIEPĀ   ; !"XX"
luʼm:luʼm N_LUʼM   ; !"lumi"
lȭda:lȭda N_RŌDA   ; !"XX"
midžā:miʼdžā N_DADŽĀ   ; !"XX"
munād:muʼnā N_KALĀ-PL   ; !"XX"
mõtsātīed:mõtsā#tīe N_TĪE-PL   ; !"XX"
mǭrjei:mǭr#jei N_BRĪ   ; !"XX"
națkǟnga:naț#kǟnga N_KǞNGA   ; !"XX"
nipstā:nipstā N_MAKSĀ   ; !"XX"
nõtk:nõtk N_USK   ; !"XX"
nõʼggõlsīlma:nõʼggõl#sīlma N_SĪLMA   ; !"XX"
nǭra:nǭra N_JǬRA   ; !"XX"
oksā:oksā N_OKSĀ   ; !"oksa"
pitliestā:pit#liestā N_LIESTĀ   ; !"XX"
piʼvlūd:piʼv#lū N_PŪ-PL   ; !"XX"
platš:platš N_OKŠ   ; !"XX"
plǭțlēba:plǭț#lēba N_LĒBA   ; !"XX"
poḑīd:poʼḑ N_PIʼŅ-PL   ; !"XX"
punā:puʼnā N_KALĀ-SG   ; !"XX"
puŗŗõkuoʼig:puŗŗõ#kuoʼig N_KUOʼIG   ; !"XX"
pōtša:pōtša N_NĒTŠA   ; !"XX"
pūola:pūola N_PŪOLA   ; !"XX"
pūšõlteʼb:pūšõl#teʼb N_KIʼV   ; !"XX"
pūʼojnabā:pūʼoj#nabā N_PADĀ-SG   ; !"XX"
pǟažā:pǟ#aʼžā N_AŽĀ   ; !"XX"
rabād:rabā N_PADĀ-PL   ; !"XX"
rak:rak N_TUP   ; !"XX"
raņțpūjālgad:raņț#pū#jālga N_SĪLMA-PL   ; !"XX"
restūd:rest N_MAKS-PL   ; !"XX"
reņ:reņ N_REŅ   ; !"XX"
ribā:riʼbā N_PADĀ   ; !"XX"
rištizā:rišt#iʼzā N_IZĀ   ; !"XX"
roʼvrõkūd:roʼv#rõk N_TUP-PL   ; !"XX"
rāndanaigā:rāndan#aʼigā N_AIGĀ   ; !"XX"
rōdad:rōda N_RŌDA-PL   ; !"XX"
saps:saps N_MAKS   ; !"XX"
sidāmsõbrā:sidām#sõʼbrā N_SÕBRĀ   ; !"XX"
siegājaʼgluʼg:siegā#jaʼg#luʼg N_SUʼG   ; !"XX"
sigātaptõbāiga:sigā#taptõb#āiga N_ĀIGA   ; !"XX"
sizālažād:sizāl#ažā N_AŽĀ-PL   ; !"XX"
strepīd:strep N_KEP-PL   ; !"XX"
summa:summa N_LILLA   ; !"XX"
sõʼvpivād:sõʼv#piʼvā N_TUBĀ-PL   ; !"XX"
sāinakīela:sāina#kīela N_KĒRA   ; !"XX"
sēmḑa:sēmḑa N_SĒMḐA   ; !"maito"
sūolõtȭlpa:sūolõ#tȭlpa N_ĀITA   ; !"XX"
sūrsušā:sūr#sušā N_SUŠĀ   ; !"XX"
sūrveʼž:sūr#veʼž N_VEʼŽ   ; !"XX"
sǟrsukā:sǟr#sukā N_SUKĀ   ; !"XX"
tarātīe:tarā#tīe N_TĪE   ; !"XX"
tei:tei N_TEI   ; !"XX"
tsak:tsak N_KEP   ; !"XX"
tuʼlsiʼž:tuʼl#siʼž N_SUʼŽ   ; !"XX"
tīetiegūd:tīe#tieʼg N_VAʼG-PL   ; !"XX"
tōka:tōka N_MȬKA   ; !"XX"
ulzraʼbbõm:ulz#raʼbbõm N_¤29   ; !"XX"
ulzõlastõbpǟva:ulzõ#lastõb#pǟva N_PǞVA   ; !"XX"
uļļi$$sāina:uļļi$$sāina N_ĀINA   ; !"XX"
vadākuoț:vadā#kuoț N_KUOȚ   ; !"XX"
vakț:vakț N_VAKȚ   ; !"XX"
vanājoʼug:vanā#joʼug N_JOʼUG   ; !"XX"
vanāmieʼr:vanā#mieʼr N_MIEʼR   ; !"XX"
vațīd:vaț N_KUOȚ-PL   ; !"XX"
vaʼinikā:vaʼinikā N_KÄPĀ   ; !"XX"
vaʼitsõnā:vaʼit#sõʼnā N_KALĀ   ; !"XX"
vaʼnnizpǟvad:vaʼnniz#pǟva N_PǞVA-PL   ; !"XX"
veispǟ:veis#pǟ N_PǞ   ; !"XX"
vepšpūd:vepš#pūd N_PŪ   ; !"XX"
veʼr:veʼr N_MEʼR   ; !"veri"
võņdžõ:võņdžõ N_¤51   ; !"XX"
vāldavašk:vālda#vašk N_VAŠK   ; !"XX"
vēna:vēna N_VĒNA   ; !"XX"
vīrtša:vīrtša N_TŠŪRTŠA   ; !"XX"
vīļakušt:vīļa#kušt N_KRUȚK   ; !"XX"
vǭja:vǭja N_LǬJA   ; !"XX"
vǭjad:vǭja N_LǬJA-PL   ; !"XX"
vǭʼ:vǭʼ N_RǬʼ   ; !"XX"
vȱntsa:vȱntsa N_VȰNTSA   ; !"XX"
zuš:zuš N_KAŠ   ; !"XX"
zōfa:zōfa N_KRǬIPA   ; !"XX"
äbī:äbī N_TORĪ   ; !"XX"
älviʼb:äl#viʼb N_VAʼG   ; !"XX"
äʼbjõvā:äʼb#jõvā N_TUBĀ   ; !"XX"
āinad:āina N_ĀINA-PL   ; !"XX"
āļdža:āļdža N_ĀĻDŽA   ; !"XX"
īrpūoga:īr#pūoga N_PŪOGA   ; !"XX"
štokbāntad:štok#bānta N_ĀITA-PL   ; !"XX"
ūrtapiʼņ:ūrta#piʼņ N_PIʼŅ   ; !"XX"
ūška:ūška N_ŪŠKA   ; !"XX"
ūʼoļmõaʼr:ūʼoļmõ#aʼr N_MUʼR   ; !"XX"
ȭʼdõgvaʼl:ȭʼdõg#vaʼl N_NIʼM   ; !"XX"
